Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.750

Supported employment—Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise the definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 41.04.760 through 41.04.780.

(1) "Developmental disability" means a disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.

(2) "Significant disability" means a disability as defined in 29 U.S.C. Sec. 705.

(3) "Supported employment" means employment for individuals with developmental disabilities or other significant disabilities who require on-the-job training and long-term support in order to fulfill their job duties successfully. Supported employment offers the same wages and benefits as similar nonsupported employment positions.

(4) "State agency" means any office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, community college or institution of higher education, or agency of the state of Washington.

[ 1999 c 178 s 2; 1997 c 287 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—1997 c 287: "The legislature finds that the rate of unemployment among individuals with developmental disabilities or other significant disabilities is high due to the limited employment opportunities available to them. Given that individuals with developmental disabilities or other significant disabilities are capable of filling employment positions in the general workforce population, supported employment is an effective way of integrating such individuals into the general workforce population. The creation of supported employment programs can increase the types and availability of employment positions for individuals with developmental disabilities or other significant disabilities." [ 1999 c 178 s 1; 1997 c 287 s 1.]